Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2556YC (2) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.463, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 3 a motor vehicle equipped with an engine fueled primarily by 4 natural gas or a motor vehicle powered primarily by means 5 of electric battery power may exceed any applicable maximum 6 gross weight limit under this chapter , up to a maximum gross 7 weight of eighty-two thousand pounds , by an amount equal to 8 the difference between the weight of the vehicle attributable 9 to the natural gas tank and fueling system installed in the 10 vehicle and the weight of a comparable diesel fuel tank and 11 fueling system . 12